Tennessee, session 114, SB2420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-209(a), is amended by
deleting the language "forty-five (45) days" and substituting "thirty (30) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2420
012707
- 1 -